test/src/morphology/V-koltash_gt-norm.yaml
     
#    Verb - ӹштӓш: # Verb-em 'do; try out'
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ӹштем
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ӹштет
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ӹштӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ӹштенӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ӹштедӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ӹштӓт
     
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ӹштӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg: ӹштеп
#    
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1: ӹштӹшӹм
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2: ӹштӹшӹц
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3: ӹштӹш
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1: ӹштӹшнӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2: ӹштӹшдӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3: ӹштевӹ
     
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+ConNeg: ӹштӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+ConNeg: ӹштеп
#
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg1: ӹштенӓм
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2: ӹштенӓт
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3: ӹштен
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl1: ӹштеннӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2: ӹштендӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3: ӹштенӹт
##   
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg1: ӹштӹделам
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: ӹштӹделат
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: ӹштӹде 
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl1: ӹштӹделна
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: ӹштӹделда
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: ӹштӹделыт
##   
     ӹштӓш+V+Imprt+Sg3: ӹштӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+Imprt+Sg3: ӹштӹжӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+Imprt+Pl3: ӹштӹдӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+Imprt+Pl3: ӹштӹштӹ
##   
     ӹштӓш+V+ImprtII+Sg2: ӹштемӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+ImprtII+Pl2: ӹштемӓдӓ
##   
     ӹштӓш+V+Des+Sg1: ӹштӹнем
     ӹштӓш+V+Des+Sg3: ӹштӹнет
     ӹштӓш+V+Des+Sg3: ӹштӹнежӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+Des+Pl1: ӹштӹненӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+Des+Pl3: ӹштӹнедӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+Des+Pl3: ӹштӹнештӹ
